Wyoming, session 2026, SF0030.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 18-16-102(a)(ix)(C) and (G),
22-1-102(a)(xxvi), 22-3-102(a)(ii) and (vi), 22-3-103(b)
and 22-29-104(a)(v)(C) and (G) are amended to read:
18-16-102. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(ix) "Qualified elector" means a natural person
who:
(C) Will be at least eighteen (18) years of
age on the day of the next election; at which he may offer
to vote;
(G) Has been a bona fide resident of
Wyoming for not less than thirty (30) days before the date
of the next election. at which he offers to vote.
22-1-102. Definitions.
(a) The definitions contained in this chapter apply
to words and phrases used in this Election Code and govern
the construction of those words and phrases unless they are
specifically modified by the context in which they appear.
As used in this Election Code:
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0030
ENROLLED ACT NO. 5, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(xxvi) "Qualified elector" includes every
citizen of the United States who is a bona fide resident of
Wyoming, has been a bona fide resident of Wyoming for not
less than thirty (30) days before the date of the next
election, at which he offers to vote, has registered to
vote and will be at least eighteen (18) years of age on the
day of the next election. at which he may offer to vote. No
person is a qualified elector who is a currently
adjudicated mentally incompetent person, or who has been
convicted of a felony and his civil or voting rights have
not been restored. A literacy test shall not be imposed as
a condition to voting in any election;
22-3-102. Qualifications; temporary registration.
(a) A person may register to vote not less than
fourteen (14) days before an election, at any election
specified in W.S. 22-2-101(a)(i) through (viii) or as
provided by W.S. 22-3-117, who satisfies the following
qualifications:
(ii) He will be at least eighteen (18) years of
age on the day of the next general election provided he
shall not be permitted to vote until he has attained the
age of eighteen (18);
(vi) He has been a bona fide resident of Wyoming
for not less than thirty (30) days before the date of the
next election. at which he offers to vote.
22-3-103. Furnishing of oath forms; contents thereof.
(b) Following the provision of the information
required in subsection (a) of this section, the form shall
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0030
ENROLLED ACT NO. 5, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
require the applicant's signature in full below the
following oath:
I, ...., do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I am a citizen
of the United States; that I am a bona fide resident of the
state of Wyoming and this county; I have resided in the
state for not less than thirty (30) days before the date of
the next election; that if registered in another county or
state, I hereby request that my registration be withdrawn;
that I will be at least eighteen (18) years of age on or
before the next election; that I am not currently
adjudicated a mentally incompetent person, that I have not
been convicted of a felony, or if I have been convicted of
a felony, I have had my civil or voting rights restored by
a competent authority; and that the voter registration
information contained herein is true and accurate to my
best knowledge and belief.
.... (Signature in full of applicant)
Subscribed and affirmed or sworn to before me by .... this
.... day of ...., (year).
.... (Signature and title of registry agent or person
authorized to administer oaths)
22-29-104. Definitions when principal act is silent.
(a) When used in a principal act, the following
definitions apply, unless the term is otherwise
specifically defined in that principal act:
(v) "Qualified elector" means a natural person
who:
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0030
ENROLLED ACT NO. 5, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(C) Will be at least eighteen (18) years of
age on the day of the next election; at which he may offer
to vote;
(G) Has been a bona fide resident of
Wyoming for not less than thirty (30) days before the date
of the next election. at which he offers to vote.
Section 2. This act is effective June 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
4